services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 78 Y 75
SFX 78 0 0 .
SFX 78 0 a .
SFX 78 0 ago .
SFX 78 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 78 0 ak .
SFX 78 0 arekin .
SFX 78 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 aren .
SFX 78 0 arendako .
SFX 78 0 arentzat .
SFX 78 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 78 0 ari .
SFX 78 0 az .
SFX 78 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 dun .
SFX 78 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 78 0 ean .
SFX 78 0 egi .
SFX 78 0 egi/1,360 .
SFX 78 0 ei .
SFX 78 0 ek .
SFX 78 0 ekin .
SFX 78 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 eko .
SFX 78 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 78 0 en .
SFX 78 0 endako .
SFX 78 0 entzat .
SFX 78 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 en/1,372 .
SFX 78 0 era .
SFX 78 0 eraino .
SFX 78 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 erantz .
SFX 78 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 78 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 erat .
SFX 78 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 78 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 78 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 78 0 etik .
SFX 78 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 ez .
SFX 78 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 78 0 gatik .
SFX 78 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 i .
SFX 78 0 ik .
SFX 78 0 ki .
SFX 78 0 ki/1,374 .
SFX 78 0 oi .
SFX 78 0 ok .
SFX 78 0 okin .
SFX 78 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 on .
SFX 78 0 ontzat .
SFX 78 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 78 0 otaz .
SFX 78 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 78 0 oz .
SFX 78 0 pe .
SFX 78 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 78 0 tasun .
SFX 78 0 tasun/1,361 .
SFX 78 0 txo .
SFX 78 0 txo/1,367 .
SFX 78 0 tzar .
SFX 78 0 tzarr/1,382 .
SFX 78 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 78 0 tzat .
SFX 78 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 78 0 xe/1,384 .
SFX 2 Y 24
SFX 2 0 0 .
SFX 2 0 dura .
SFX 2 0 dura/1,357 .
SFX 2 0 dur/1,358 .
SFX 2 0 garri .
SFX 2 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 2 0 men .
SFX 2 0 mendu .
SFX 2 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 2 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 2 0 pen .
SFX 2 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 2 0 raz .
SFX 2 0 raz/1,362 .
SFX 2 0 tu .
SFX 2 0 tu/1,363 .
SFX 2 0 tzaile .
SFX 2 0 tzaile/1,364 .
SFX 2 0 tze .
SFX 2 0 tzear .
SFX 2 0 tzeke .
SFX 2 0 tzen .
SFX 2 0 tzen/1,365 .
SFX 2 0 tze/1,366 .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 0 .
SFX 68 Y 19
SFX 68 0 ño .
SFX 68 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 68 0 dun .
SFX 68 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 68 0 gile .
SFX 68 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 68 0 ka .
SFX 68 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 68 0 pe .
SFX 68 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 68 0 tsu .
SFX 68 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 68 0 txo .
SFX 68 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 68 0 tzar .
SFX 68 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 68 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 68 0 tzat .
SFX 68 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 120 Y 19
SFX 120 0 0 .
SFX 120 0 garri .
SFX 120 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 120 0 men .
SFX 120 0 mendu .
SFX 120 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 120 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 120 0 pen .
SFX 120 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 120 0 taraz .
SFX 120 0 taraz/1,362 .
SFX 120 0 te .
SFX 120 0 tear .
SFX 120 0 teke .
SFX 120 0 ten .
SFX 120 0 ten/1,365 .
SFX 120 0 te/1,366 .
SFX 120 0 tu .
SFX 120 0 tu/1,363 .
SFX 121 Y 3
SFX 121 0 0 .
SFX 121 0 ago .
SFX 121 0 ago/1,388 .
SFX 122 Y 7
SFX 122 0 0 .
SFX 122 0 ago .
SFX 122 0 ago/1,388 .
SFX 122 0 egi .
SFX 122 0 egi/1,388 .
SFX 122 0 en .
SFX 122 0 en/1,389 .
SFX 123 Y 19
SFX 123 0 0 .
SFX 123 0 du .
SFX 123 0 du/1,363 .
SFX 123 0 garri .
SFX 123 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 123 0 men .
SFX 123 0 mendu .
SFX 123 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 123 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 123 0 pen .
SFX 123 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 123 0 taraz .
SFX 123 0 taraz/1,362 .
SFX 123 0 tze .
SFX 123 0 tzear .
SFX 123 0 tzeke .
SFX 123 0 tzen .
SFX 123 0 tzen/1,365 .
SFX 123 0 tze/1,366 .
SFX 124 Y 59
SFX 124 0 0 .
SFX 124 0 ño .
SFX 124 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 124 0 a .
SFX 124 0 ago .
SFX 124 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 124 0 ak .
SFX 124 0 an .
SFX 124 0 arekin .
SFX 124 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 aren .
SFX 124 0 arendako .
SFX 124 0 arentzat .
SFX 124 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 124 0 ari .
SFX 124 0 az .
SFX 124 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 dun .
SFX 124 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 124 0 ei .
SFX 124 0 ek .
SFX 124 0 ekin .
SFX 124 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 en .
SFX 124 0 endako .
SFX 124 0 entzat .
SFX 124 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 124 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 124 0 ez .
SFX 124 0 gatik .
SFX 124 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 gile .
SFX 124 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 124 0 ka .
SFX 124 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 oi .
SFX 124 0 ok .
SFX 124 0 okin .
SFX 124 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 on .
SFX 124 0 ontzat .
SFX 124 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 124 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 124 0 otaz .
SFX 124 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 124 0 oz .
SFX 124 0 pe .
SFX 124 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 124 0 tsu .
SFX 124 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 124 0 txo .
SFX 124 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 124 0 tzar .
SFX 124 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 124 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 124 0 tzat .
SFX 124 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 125 Y 56
SFX 125 0 ño .
SFX 125 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 125 0 a .
SFX 125 0 ago .
SFX 125 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 125 0 ak .
SFX 125 0 an .
SFX 125 0 arekin .
SFX 125 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 aren .
SFX 125 0 arendako .
SFX 125 0 arentzat .
SFX 125 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 125 0 ari .
SFX 125 0 az .
SFX 125 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 dun .
SFX 125 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 125 0 ei .
SFX 125 0 ek .
SFX 125 0 ekin .
SFX 125 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 en .
SFX 125 0 endako .
SFX 125 0 entzat .
SFX 125 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 125 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 125 0 ez .
SFX 125 0 gile .
SFX 125 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 125 0 ka .
SFX 125 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 oi .
SFX 125 0 ok .
SFX 125 0 okin .
SFX 125 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 on .
SFX 125 0 ontzat .
SFX 125 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 125 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 125 0 otaz .
SFX 125 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 125 0 oz .
SFX 125 0 pe .
SFX 125 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 125 0 tsu .
SFX 125 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 125 0 txo .
SFX 125 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 125 0 tzar .
SFX 125 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 125 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 125 0 tzat .
SFX 125 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 126 Y 5
SFX 126 0 0 .
SFX 126 0 araz .
SFX 126 0 araz/1,362 .
SFX 126 0 i .
SFX 126 0 i/1,363 .
SFX 127 Y 16
SFX 127 0 garri .
SFX 127 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 127 0 le .
SFX 127 0 le/1,364 .
SFX 127 0 men .
SFX 127 0 mendu .
SFX 127 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 127 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 127 0 pen .
SFX 127 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 127 0 te .
SFX 127 0 tear .
SFX 127 0 teke .
SFX 127 0 ten .
SFX 127 0 ten/1,365 .
SFX 127 0 te/1,366 .
SFX 128 Y 5
SFX 128 0 ko .
SFX 128 0 koa .
SFX 128 0 koak .
SFX 128 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 128 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 129 Y 8
SFX 129 0 0 .
SFX 129 0 ko .
SFX 129 0 koa .
SFX 129 0 koak .
SFX 129 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 129 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 129 0 tik .
SFX 129 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 414 Y 88
SFX 414 0 ago .
SFX 414 0 agoko .
SFX 414 0 agokoa .
SFX 414 0 agokoagan .
SFX 414 0 agokoagana .
SFX 414 0 agokoaganaino .
SFX 414 0 agokoaganantz .
SFX 414 0 agokoagandik .
SFX 414 0 agokoagatik .
SFX 414 0 agokoago .
SFX 414 0 agokoak .
SFX 414 0 agokoan .
SFX 414 0 agokoarekin .
SFX 414 0 agokoarendako .
SFX 414 0 agokoarentzat .
SFX 414 0 agokoari .
SFX 414 0 agokoaz .
SFX 414 0 agokoegi .
SFX 414 0 agokoei .
SFX 414 0 agokoek .
SFX 414 0 agokoekin .
SFX 414 0 agokoendako .
SFX 414 0 agokoentzat .
SFX 414 0 agokoez .
SFX 414 0 agokogatik .
SFX 414 0 agokok .
SFX 414 0 agokooi .
SFX 414 0 agokook .
SFX 414 0 agokookin .
SFX 414 0 agokoontzat .
SFX 414 0 agokootaz .
SFX 414 0 agokooz .
SFX 414 0 agokora .
SFX 414 0 agokoraino .
SFX 414 0 agokorantz .
SFX 414 0 agokorat .
SFX 414 0 agokorekin .
SFX 414 0 agokorendako .
SFX 414 0 agokorentzat .
SFX 414 0 agokori .
SFX 414 0 agokorik .
SFX 414 0 agokotik .
SFX 414 0 agokotzat .
SFX 414 0 agokoz .
SFX 414 0 egi .
SFX 414 0 egiko .
SFX 414 0 egikoa .
SFX 414 0 egikoagan .
SFX 414 0 egikoagana .
SFX 414 0 egikoaganaino .
SFX 414 0 egikoaganantz .
SFX 414 0 egikoagandik .
SFX 414 0 egikoagatik .
SFX 414 0 egikoago .
SFX 414 0 egikoak .
SFX 414 0 egikoan .
SFX 414 0 egikoarekin .
SFX 414 0 egikoarendako .
SFX 414 0 egikoarentzat .
SFX 414 0 egikoari .
SFX 414 0 egikoaz .
SFX 414 0 egikoegi .
SFX 414 0 egikoei .
SFX 414 0 egikoek .
SFX 414 0 egikoekin .
SFX 414 0 egikoendako .
SFX 414 0 egikoentzat .
SFX 414 0 egikoez .
SFX 414 0 egikogatik .
SFX 414 0 egikok .
SFX 414 0 egikooi .
SFX 414 0 egikook .
SFX 414 0 egikookin .
SFX 414 0 egikoontzat .
SFX 414 0 egikootaz .
SFX 414 0 egikooz .
SFX 414 0 egikora .
SFX 414 0 egikoraino .
SFX 414 0 egikorantz .
SFX 414 0 egikorat .
SFX 414 0 egikorekin .
SFX 414 0 egikorendako .
SFX 414 0 egikorentzat .
SFX 414 0 egikori .
SFX 414 0 egikorik .
SFX 414 0 egikotik .
SFX 414 0 egikotzat .
SFX 414 0 egikoz .
