services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.dic
adiz/68,1
ados/1002,120,1
ados/1002,121,1
agin/1002,123,1
ago/125,1
ahape/129,1
ahoka/1002,2,1
ahuspez/1002,120,1
ainar/124,1
aintzates/1002,127,1
aintzatets/1002,126,1
aitzurrox/68,1
akastun/78,1
aldrebes/1002,120,1
altsuma/1002,2,1
altzotar/124,1
amez/68,1
andantino/122,1
apales/1002,127,1
apalets/1002,126,1
arantzabelz/68,1
arantza/1002,2,1
araudun/78,1
arbin/1002,122,1
arnasos/68,1
arraiz/125,1
arraz/125,1
ar/124,1
asalta/1002,2,1
askies/1002,127,1
askiets/1002,126,1
astotzar/124,1
asunbelz/68,1
atzemanezin/78,1
aurkez/1002,120,1
aurreiriz/1002,127,1
aurrezti/128,1
autorregula/1002,2,1
azpidatz/1002,126,1
bakarrik/121,1
barema/1002,2,1
barren/78,1
bar/124,1
bazterres/1002,127,1
bazterrets/1002,126,1
belabelz/68,1
berres/1002,127,1
berrets/1002,126,1
berri-berriti/128,1
berriztezin/78,1
betikar/124,1
bihar-etzieta/128,1
biper/124,1
birxurga/1002,2,1
bisualki/122,1
bizardun/78,1
boiko/68,1
croissan/68,1
definiezin/78,1
desafia/1002,2,1
desjarauns/1002,127,1
desjaraunts/1002,126,1
desordena/1002,2,1
destoles/1002,120,1
doi-doietari/128,1
dones/1002,127,1
ebats/1002,126,1
efektua/1002,2,1
egokies/1002,127,1
egonezin/78,1
egotz/1002,126,1
egundaino/129,1
emozionalki/122,1
engoiti/128,1
erais/1002,127,1
eraits/1002,126,1
erantz/1002,126,1
eranz/1002,127,1
erdies/1002,127,1
erdiets/1002,126,1
ereinoz/68,1
ernalezin/78,1
erraz/1002,120,1
erreberentzia/1002,2,1
esku-zikin/78,1
eskuets/1002,126,1
esmerila/1002,2,1
ester/124,1
estetikoki/122,1
es/1002,127,1
etikoki/122,1
ezain/78,1
ezini/128,1
fei/68,1
fitetz/122,1
fluidiza/1002,2,1
gain-gaineti/128,1
gainidatz/1002,126,1
gainidaz/1002,127,1
gaizkindun/78,1
galaz/125,1
gar/124,1
gaur-bihar/129,1
gaurgoiti/128,1
gaz/125,1
gehies/1002,127,1
gehiets/1002,126,1
geroxe/121,1
gerozti/128,1
gigaherz/68,1
gogoarin/78,1
gogortxo/122,1
goiztxo/122,1
gola/1002,2,1
gor/124,1
gupides/1002,127,1
gupidets/1002,126,1
gur/124,1
halz/68,1
han-hor/129,1
haraxeranz/128,1
haretxeki/128,1
harrapaezin/78,1
haurdani/128,1
haus/125,1
hauts/1002,126,1
heuregana/1002,2,1
hiles/1002,127,1
hipoteka-bermedun/78,1
hirukoiz/68,1
honainditi/128,1
honaxeranz/128,1
honetxeki/128,1
honetxentza/128,1
horraxeranz/128,1
horretxeki/128,1
horretxentza/128,1
hor/129,1
hur-hurreti/128,1
hurbildi/128,1
hurreti/128,1
hurre/122,1
iaz/129,1
idatz/1002,126,1
idaz/1002,127,1
ilar/124,1
ildaus/1002,127,1
ildauts/1002,126,1
ileberdin/78,1
inklina/1002,2,1
iparrorraz/68,1
iras/1002,127,1
irats/1002,126,1
iruz/1002,127,1
isil-gordean/122,1
itun/78,1
izar/124,1
jabal/1002,122,1
jadets/1002,126,1
jaiotzeti/128,1
janz/1002,127,1
jauntz/1002,126,1
justifikaezin/78,1
kalibra/1002,2,1
kaliz/125,1
kamer/124,1
kardax/68,1
kar/124,1
kaskar/124,1
kenezin/78,1
kolazta/1002,2,1
konfi/68,1
konforme/122,1
kontziliaezin/78,1
krater/124,1
kroska/1002,2,1
kurkus/125,1
kux/125,1
laburtxo/122,1
laides/1002,127,1
laketets/1002,126,1
langar/124,1
lapras/68,1
lasaitxo/122,1
laudun/78,1
lehendani/128,1
ler/124,1
liber/124,1
libre/122,1
logaizka/1002,2,1
lorraz/68,1
lortezin/78,1
lurruz/1002,127,1
luzets/1002,126,1
maiztxo/122,1
maratz/122,1
marmar/124,1
maskar/124,1
mazkar/124,1
megaherz/68,1
mela/1002,2,1
merke/122,1
milioidun/78,1
mor/124,1
munz/68,1
muzilagodun/78,1
nabarmen/1002,122,1
nahika/1002,2,1
nekez/122,1
nonbaiteti/128,1
nonbai/128,1
noski/121,1
onuradun/78,1
opes/1002,127,1
ordudani/128,1
ortos/125,1
otsapuz/68,1
ozen/1002,122,1
paka/1002,2,1
pale/125,1
palier/124,1
par/124,1
pas/125,1
pegats/1002,126,1
perkain/78,1
piole/68,1
polimeriza/1002,2,1
potxer/124,1
pozik/121,1
poz/1002,120,1
propio/122,1
saltoka/1002,2,1
samar/124,1
samas/68,1
seguru/1002,122,1
sendes/1002,127,1
sinets/1002,126,1
sinis/1002,120,1
sorgin/78,1
suje/68,1
tarda/1002,2,1
tente/1002,122,1
toles/1002,120,1
trabesti/1002,122,1
tui/125,1
tupus/68,1
turbobultza/1002,2,1
txango/122,1
txarres/1002,127,1
txarrets/1002,126,1
txikitandi/128,1
uhar/124,1
ukandun/78,1
umezurz/68,1
urrix/125,1
urrunxko/122,1
utzies/1002,127,1
utziets/1002,126,1
xutik/121,1
zafarda/1002,2,1
zaltuts/122,1
zeni/68,1
zinkulin-minkulin/78,1
zirtaka/1002,2,1
zurdaz/68,1
